North Dakota, session 69, SB2137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 20.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Hunting big game animals using supplemental feed not prohibited or restricted.
The department may not adopt a rule or implement a policy prohibiting or restricting the use of
supplemental feed on private property for hunting a big game animal.
SECTION 2. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through July 31, 2029, and after that date is
ineffective.

S. B. NO. 2137 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2137.
Senate Vote: Yeas 31 Nays 15 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 56 Nays 34 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State